Tennessee, session 114, SB0473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Veterans Assistance for
Livelihood, Opportunity, and Relief (VALOR) Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-104(a)(4)(B), is amended by
deleting the following language:
Permanent sport combination hunting and fishing license upon payment of a one-
time ten-dollar fee to those residents of Tennessee who are one hundred percent
(100%) permanently and totally service connected disabled veterans who apply for such
discounts and exemptions prior to or after May 24, 2000. The agency shall accept as
evidence of service-connected disability for the purposes of this subdivision (a)(4)(B) a
certification from the veterans' administration.
and substituting instead the following:
Permanent sport combination hunting and fishing license without the payment of
a fee to those residents of this state who are disabled veterans with one hundred
percent (100%) permanent and total disability from a service-connected cause, as
determined by the United States department of veterans affairs.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-704(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a) There must be paid from the general funds of the state to certain disabled
veterans the amount necessary to pay or reimburse such taxpayers for all of the local
SB0473
000570
- 1 -

property taxes paid for a given tax year on that property that the disabled veteran owned
and used as the disabled veteran's residence as provided in this section.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 4, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, an owner or lessee of a motor
vehicle who is a resident of this state and who is a disabled veteran who has one
hundred percent (100%) permanent and total disability from a service-connected cause,
as determined by the United States department of veterans affairs, is exempt from taxes
and fees under this chapter for the registration of one (1) private passenger automobile,
recreational vehicle, or truck of one-half (1/2) or three-quarter (3/4) ton rating pursuant to
§ 55-4-103.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000570